Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,164
Enforcement of rights; remedies.

(1) All rights of local housing agencies existing under law or under any contract, agreement, or arrangement with any party, including this state or any public agency thereof, shall be enforceable by action brought in the courts of this state.

(2) In connection with enforcement of any right referred to in this section, a local housing agency shall be entitled to relief which may include, without limitation, the award of monetary damages, specific performance, and mandamus and other injunctive relief.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 93.